Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.230

Cooperative watershed management.

A county may, acting through the county legislative authority, participate in and expend revenue on cooperative watershed management actions, including watershed management partnerships under RCW 39.34.210 and other intergovernmental agreements, for purposes of water supply, water quality, and water resource and habitat protection and management.

[ 2003 c 327 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2003 c 327: See note following RCW 39.34.190.